Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-306
Rules and regulations; fire safety; violation; penalty.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations permitting any type of fire, including the smoking of tobacco in any form, and providing for the size, location, and conditions under which a fire may be established on any area under its ownership or control. The commission may enact rules and regulations permitting the possession or use of any type of fireworks not prohibited by law on any areas under its ownership or control. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations authorizing management personnel to temporarily revoke permission by the posting of appropriate signs for all fires of any kind whatsoever, including smoking and the use of fireworks, in any area under its ownership or control, when such posting is in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare or for the preservation of property. Any person who lights any type of fire, uses any fireworks, smokes tobacco in any form, or leaves unattended and unextinguished any fire of any type in any location, in any area under the ownership or control of the commission, unless the commission has given permission, which permission has not been revoked, to such type of fire, to such use or possession of fireworks, or to such smoking of tobacco, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 64.